test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-okimaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - okimâw - ok : # -m animate noun, chief, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 135

     okimâw+N+AN+Sg: okimâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl: okimâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Loc: okimâwihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Obv: okimâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: okimâsis
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: okimâsisak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: okimâsisihk
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôkimâm
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminân
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôkimâmak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâma
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôkimâminânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôkimâminawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôkimâmiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâmiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otôkimâmiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôkimâsisim
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôkimâsisim
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâsisima
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otôkimâsisimiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôkimâsisiminân
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôkimâsisiminaw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôkimâsisimiwâw
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâsisimiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otôkimâsisimiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôkimâsisimak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôkimâsisimak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôkimâsisima
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otôkimâsisimiyiwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôkimâsisiminânak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôkimâsisiminawak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôkimâsisimiwâwak
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôkimâsisimiwâwa
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otôkimâsisimiyiwa
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôkimâmihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôkimâmiyihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôkimâminânihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôkimâminâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôkimâmiwâwihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôkimâmiwâwihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôkimâmiyihk
     
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôkimâsisimihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôkimâsisimihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôkimâsisimihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôkimâsisimiyihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôkimâsisiminânihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôkimâsisiminâhk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôkimâsisimiwâwihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôkimâsisimiwâwihk
     okimâw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôkimâsisimiyihk
